th: ตำแหน่งขั้วต่อ: ล่างซ้าย; ล่างขวา; กลาง; ด้านซ้าย; ด้านขวา; บนซ้าย; บนขวา; อื่นๆ
nb: Kontaktposisjon: Nedre venstre; Nedre høyre; Senter; Venstre; Høyre; Øvre venstre; Øvre høyre; Annet
fr: Position du connecteur: En bas à gauche; En bas à droite; Centre; Gauche; Droite; En haut à gauche; En haut à droite; Autre
de: Steckerposition: Unten links; Unten rechts; Mitte; Links; Rechts; Oben links; Oben rechts; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 连接器位置: 左下; 右下; 中间; 左; 右; 左上; 右上; 其他
sv: Kontaktposition: Nedre vänster; Nedre höger; Mitten; Vänster; Höger; Övre vänster; Övre höger; Övrigt
ru: Положение разъема: Снизу слева; Снизу справа; Центр; Слева; Справа; Сверху слева; Сверху справа; Другой
da: Stikposition: Nederst til venstre; Nederst til højre; Center; Venstre; Højre; Øverst til venstre; Øverst til højre; Andet
en: Connector position: Bottom left; Bottom right; Center; Left; Right; Top left; Top right; Other
cs: Poloha konektoru: Vlevo dole; Vpravo dole; Střední; Levá strana; Pravá strana; Vlevo nahoře; Vpravo nahoře; Jiné
tr: Konnektör konumu: Sol alt; Sağ alt; Merkez; Sol; Sağ; Sol üst; Sağ üst; Diğer
es: Posición del conector: Inferior izquierda; Inferior derecha; Centro; Izquierda; Derecha; Superior izquierda; Superior derecha; Otros
pl: Pozycja złącza: Dolny lewy; Dolny prawy; Środek; Lewy; Prawy; Górny lewy; Górny prawy; Inne
hu: Csatlakozó pozíciója: Bal alsó; Jobb alsó; Középen; Bal oldal; Jobb oldal; Bal felső; Jobb felső; Egyéb
fi: Liittimen sijainti: Alhaalla vasemmalla; Alhaalla oikealla; Keskusta; Vasen; Oikea; Ylhäällä vasemmalla; Ylhäällä oikealla; Muu
ko: 커넥터 위치: 하단 왼쪽; 하단 오른쪽; 가운데; 왼쪽; 오른쪽; 상단 왼쪽; 상단 오른쪽; 기타
it: Posizione del connettore: In basso a sinistra; In basso a destra; Centro; A sinistra; A destra; In alto a sinistra; In alto a destra; Altro
sk-SK: Pozícia konektora: Vľavo dole; Vpravo dole; Stredový; Vľavo; Vpravo; Vľavo hore; Vpravo hore; Iné
pt-BR: Posição do conector: Inferior esquerdo; Inferior direito; Centro; Esquerda; Direita; Superior esquerdo; Superior direito; Outro
zh-TW: 連接器位置: 左下; 右下; 中; 左; 右; 左上; 右上; 其他
el: Θέση συνδετήρα: Κάτω αριστερά; Κάτω δεξιά; Κέντρο; Αριστερά; Δικαίωμα; Επάνω αριστερά; Επάνω δεξιά; Άλλο
bg-BG: Позиция на конектора: Долу вляво; Долу вдясно; Централно; Вляво; Вдясно; Горе вляво; Горе вдясно; Други
ja: コネクターの位置: 左下; 右下; 中央; 左; 右; 左上; 右上; その他
ro-RO: Poziție conector: Stânga jos; Dreapta jos; Central; Stânga; Dreapta; Stânga sus; Dreapta sus; Altele
pt-PT: Posição do conector: Inferior esquerdo; Inferior direito; Centro; Esquerda; Direita; Superior esquerdo; Superior direito; Outro
vi: Vị trí đầu nối: Dưới bên trái; Dưới bên phải; Giữa; Trái; Phải; Trên bên trái; Trên bên phải; Khác
sl-SI: Položaj priključka: Spodaj levo; Spodaj desno; Sredina; Leva; Desna; Zgoraj levo; Zgoraj desno; Drugo
hr-HR: Pozicija konektora: Dolje lijevo; Dolje desno; Sredina; Lijeva; Desna; Gore lijevo; Gore desno; Ostalo
nl: Positie connector: Linksonder; Rechtsonder; Midden; Links; Rechts; Linksboven; Rechtsboven; Andere
lt-LT: Jungties padėtis: Apačioje kairėje; Apačioje dešinėje; Centras; Kairė; Dešinė; Viršuje kairėje; Viršuje dešinėje; Kita